Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.170

Absence of remedy at law required—Affidavit.

The writ must be issued in all cases where there is not a plain, speedy and adequate remedy in the ordinary course of law. It must be issued upon affidavit on the application of the party beneficially interested.

[ 1895 c 65 s 17; RRS s 1015.]